Idaho, session 2026, H0566.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-4245, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-4246, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-4247, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-4248, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-4249, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 67-4223, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4223. POWERS OF BOARD. The park and recreation board shall:
(1) Adopt, amend or rescind rules as may be necessary for the proper ad-
ministration of the provisions of section 67-4218, et seq., Idaho Code, and
the use and protection of park and recreational areas subject to its juris-
diction. A violation of any rule promulgated by the board pursuant to this


provision that concerns the use and protection of park and recreation areas
is an infraction.
(2) Make expenditures for the acquisition, leasing, care, control,
supervision, improvement, development, extension and maintenance of all
lands under the control of the department and to make arrangements, agree-
ments, contracts or commitments, which may or may not involve expenditures
or transfer of funds, with the head of any state institution, department or
agency for the improvement or development of lands or properties under the
control of the board, or any other department or agency of the state of Idaho.
(3) Appoint advisory, local and regional park and recreational coun-
cils, to consider, study and advise in the work of the department for the ex-
tension, development, use and maintenance of any areas which are to be con-
sidered as future park or recreational sites or which are designated as park
recreational areas.
(4) Appoint a six (6) member recreational vehicle advisory committee,
who shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(f), Idaho Code, and
act in an advisory capacity to the board on matters relating to the devel-
opment and improvement of recreational vehicle related facilities and ser-
vices as provided in subsection (5) of this section. Each member of the ad-
visory committee shall be representative of recreational vehicle users with
one (1) from each of the districts described in section 67-4221, Idaho Code.
The terms of appointment shall be three (3) years, except that the initial
appointees shall commence on the date of appointment and shall be of stag-
gered lengths so that the term of two (2) members will expire annually.
(5) Administer the funds derived from the state recreational vehicle
fund established in section 49-448, Idaho Code, to provide financial assis-
tance in the form of grants to public entities for the acquisition, lease,
development, improvement, operations and maintenance of facilities and ser-
vices designed to promote the health, safety and enjoyment of recreational
vehicle users. Up to fifteen percent (15%) of the recreational vehicle fund
generated each year may be used by the department to defray recreational ve-
hicle program administrative costs. Any moneys unused at the end of the fis-
cal year shall be returned to the state treasurer for deposit in the recre-
ational vehicle fund.
(6) Cooperate with the United States and its agencies and local gov-
ernments of the state for the purpose of acquiring, leasing, supervising,
improving, developing, extending or maintaining lands which are designated
as state parks, state monuments or state recreational areas and to secure
agreements or contracts with the United States and its agencies or local
governments of the state for the accomplishment of the purposes of section
67-4218, et seq., Idaho Code.
(7) Construct, lease or otherwise establish public park or recre-
ational privileges, facilities and conveniences and to operate said recre-
ational services and to make and collect reasonable charges for their use or
to enter into contracts for their operation. The board may discount fees in
order to offer use incentives to generate additional revenue for operation
of the state park system. The net proceeds derived shall be credited to the
park and recreation fund established in section 67-4225, Idaho Code, and are
hereby specifically appropriated to defray the cost of the public park or
recreational services. The department is specifically authorized to enter


into contracts with the United States and its agencies which require that the
state expend any excess of revenue above expenses for improvements of the
recreational or park area from which the excess was derived.
(a) The board may provide for waiver of fees to any resident of Idaho
who is a disabled veteran and whose disability is rated at one hundred
percent (100%) or higher, permanent and total.
(b) The board may provide for a reduction of no more than fifty percent
(50%) of the fee charged for recreational vehicle camping, effec-
tive Monday night through Thursday night, for any senior citizen who
possesses a valid federal "golden age passport" or other equivalent
successor, as issued by a federally operated facility where an entrance
fee is charged.
(c) If any state recognizes senior citizens by offering a special park
pass for use in that state, the board may provide for a reduction of no
more than fifty percent (50%) of the fee charged for recreational ve-
hicle camping, effective Monday night through Thursday night, for any
person who possesses such a state park pass.
(d) Nonresident fees for camping must be substantially double the same
camping fees charged to residents at no fewer than five (5) state parks
by January 1, 2022. Nonresident entry fees must be substantially double
the same entry fees charged to residents at no fewer than five (5) state
parks by January 1, 2022. A single park may have more than one (1) non-
resident fee substantially doubled. Other than previously made reser-
vations as of the effective date of this act, the minimum number of sub-
stantially doubled nonresident fees referenced in this paragraph must
be in place by January 1, 2022. The board has the authority to increase
fees for nonresidents beyond the fee caps established in the Idaho ad-
ministrative code and other fees may also be increased for nonresidents
if allowed by law and preexisting contractual obligations. Nothing in
this paragraph limits the amounts or types of fees the board may charge
nonresidents.
(8) Prepare, maintain and keep up to date a comprehensive plan for the
provision of the outdoor recreational resources of the state; to develop,
operate and maintain or enter into leases or agreements with local govern-
ments for the operation and maintenance of outdoor recreational areas and
facilities of the state, and to acquire lands, waters and interests in lands
and waters for such areas and facilities.
(9) Apply to any appropriate agency or officer of the United States for
participation by the department or a political subdivision of the state or
the receipt of aid from any federal program respecting outdoor recreation.
It may enter into contracts and agreements with the United States or any ap-
propriate agency thereof, keep financial and other records relating thereto
and furnish to appropriate officials and agencies of the United States re-
ports and information as may be reasonably necessary to enable officials and
agencies to perform their duties under such programs. In connection with ob-
taining the benefits of any program, the park and recreation board shall co-
ordinate its activities with and represent the interests of all agencies and
subdivisions of the state having interests in the planning, development and
maintenance of outdoor recreational resources and facilities.


(10) Obligate the state regarding the responsible management of any
federal funds transferred to it for the purpose of any federal enactment and,
in accordance with the exercise of this responsibility, the state hereby
consents to be sued in any United States district court for the recovery
of any federal funds that the responsible federal official, department or
agency finds have been misused or disposed of contrary to the agreement with
the federal official, department or agency or contrary to the provisions of
federal enactment or applicable federal regulations.
(11) Cooperate and contract with and receive and expend aid, donations
and matching funds from the government of the United States, receive and
expend funds from the STORE and to receive and expend donations from other
sources to acquire, develop, operate and maintain outdoor recreational ar-
eas and facilities of the state and, when authorized or directed by any act
of congress or any rule or regulation of any agency of the government of the
United States, to expend funds donated or granted to the state of Idaho by the
federal government for such purposes.
Provided however, the park and recreation board shall make no commit-
ment or enter into any agreement pursuant to an exercise of authority un-
der section 67-4218, et seq., Idaho Code, until it has determined that suf-
ficient funds are available to it for meeting the state's share, if any, of
project costs. It is legislative intent that, to the extent as may be nec-
essary to assure the proper operation and maintenance of areas and facili-
ties acquired or developed pursuant to any program participated in by this
state under authority of section 67-4218, et seq., Idaho Code, such areas and
facilities shall be publicly maintained for outdoor recreational purposes.
The park and recreation board may enter into and administer agreements with
the United States or any appropriate agency thereof for planning, acquisi-
tion and development projects involving participating federal-aid funds or
state funds on behalf of any subdivision or subdivisions of this state. Pro-
vided, that the subdivision or subdivisions give necessary assurances to the
park and recreation board that they have available sufficient funds to meet
their shares, if any, of the cost of the project and that the acquired or de-
veloped areas will be operated and maintained at the expense of the subdivi-
sion or subdivisions for public outdoor recreational use.
(12) Establish, develop, supervise and maintain through cooperative
agreement, lease, purchase or other arrangement the Idaho recreation trail
system, with the advice of the coordinator created in section 67-4233, Idaho
Code, and consistent with the goals of recreation, transportation and public
access to outdoor areas.
(13) Enter into agreements with cities, counties, recreation districts
or other political subdivisions of the state to cost-effectively provide
recreational facilities, opportunities and services to the citizens of the
state.
(14) Have the authority to regulate firearm discharges in state parks
for the protection of the public. However, this subsection shall not apply
to or affect a person discharging a firearm in the lawful defense of person,
persons or property or to a person discharging a firearm in the course of law-
ful hunting. The possession or carrying of firearms is otherwise regulated
by chapter 33, title 18, Idaho Code.


(15) Enter into agreements with private, nonprofit public benefit
corporations and other persons, corporations and entities, as may be appro-
priate, to assist the department in its efforts to secure long-term funding
sources for the state park and recreation system to ensure state parks are
preserved and open for public use and enjoyment. Such agreements may in-
clude, but shall not be limited to, memberships, corporate and individual
sponsorships, the sale of advertising, and marketing agreements to fund or
promote, in whole or in part, state park and recreation events, programs and
facilities. The board may encourage sponsorships by providing appropri-
ate recognition to sponsors consistent with the mission of the department
of parks and recreation as set forth in section 67-4219, Idaho Code. All
revenue received from such agreements shall be deposited into the park and
recreation fund pursuant to section 67-4225, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.